California, session 20252026, AB42.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11157.2 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:11157.2. For purposes of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) and Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6, and notwithstanding any other law, and to the extent permitted by federal law, any grant, award, scholarship, loan, or fellowship benefit provided to any assistance unit member for the purpose of attending an institution of higher education, excluding cash payments made directly by friends or relatives, shall be exempt from consideration as income for purposes of determining eligibility for benefits or calculating grant amounts pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200). The funds described in this subdivision shall also be exempt as resources for purposes of determining eligibility for benefits or calculating grant amounts pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) for 12 months following the receipt of the funds.SEC. 2. Section 18901.09 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:18901.09. To the extent permitted by federal law, regulation, or guidance, or a waiver thereof, the department shall exercise the option provided in Section 273.9(c)(19) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations to exclude, for purposes of calculating a household’s income under CalFresh, any type of income that the department excludes when determining eligibility or benefits for cash assistance provided with federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) funds and medical assistance under Section 1931 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396u-1).SEC. 3. Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services shall implement this act through an all-county letter or similar instruction on or before March 1, 2026, until regulations are adopted.SEC. 4. No appropriation pursuant to Section 15200 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be made for purposes of implementing this act.SEC. 5. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.